Hawaii statutes.
§187A-15 Rights of inspection of catch.
Any agent of the department upon whom the board has conferred powers of police
officers or any other enforcement officer of the State shall have the authority
to conduct examinations and searches of:

(1) The contents of any bag or container of any kind
used to carry aquatic life; or

(2) Any vehicle or conveyance used to transport
aquatic life;

if such agent or officer has probable cause, as
provided by law, to believe that such bag, container, vehicle, or conveyance
contains evidence of a violation of subtitle 5 of title 12 or any rule adopted
thereunder. No person shall refuse any enforcement officer of the department
or any other enforcement officer of the State such examination and search. [L
1991, c 202, §1; am L 1999, c 195, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next